Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-702
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, in order to allow family member petitioners to remain connected, a caregiver may not arbitrarily deny visitation to a family member petitioner of a resident, whether or not the caregiver is related to such family member petitioner, unless such action is authorized by a nursing home administrator pursuant to section 71-6021.

Laws 2017, LB122, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,2017, § 42-1302;

Laws 2018, LB845, § 2.